en: USK 18
de: USK ab 18 freigegeben

en: Wireless Charging
de: Kabelloses Laden
es: Carga inalámbrica
fr: Chargement sans fil
it: Ricarica wireless

en: Quick Charging
de: Schnellladung
es: Carga rápida
fr: Charge rapide
it: Ricarica rapida

en: Water resistant
de: Wasserresistent
es: Resistente al agua
fr: Résistant à l'eau
it: Resistente all'acqua

en: Dust resistant
ar: مقاومة للغبار
de: Staubresistent
es: Resistente al polvo
fr: Résistant à la poussière
it: Resistente alla polvere
ja: 防塵
ko: 방진
nl: Stofbestendig
pl: Odporny na kurz
pt: Resistente à poeira
ru: Пылеустойчивый
zh: 防尘

en: Scratch resistant
fr: Résistant aux rayures

en: Made for iPhone
ar: صنع لأجهزة iPhone
de: Gemacht für iPhone
es: Hecho para iPhone
fr: Fabriqué pour iPhone
it: Fatto per iPhone
ja: iPhone向け
ko: iPhone용으로 제작
nl: Gemaakt voor iPhone
pl: Stworzone dla iPhone'a
pt: Feito para iPhone
ru: Сделано для iPhone
zh: 专为iPhone设计

en: Repairability index 0 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0
it: Indice di riparabilità 0 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.1 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.1 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.1 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.1 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.1
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.1 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.1 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.1 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.1 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.1 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.1 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.1 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.1 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.2 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.2 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.2 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.2 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.2
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.2 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.2 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.2 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.2 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.2 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.2 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.2 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.2 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.3 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.3 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.3 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.3 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.3
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.3 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.3 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.3 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.3 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.3 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.3 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.3 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.3 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.4 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.4 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.4 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.4 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.4
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.4 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.4 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.4 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.4 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.4 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.4 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.4 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.4 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.5 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.5 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.5 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.5 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.5
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.5 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.5 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.5 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.5 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.5 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.5 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.5 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.5 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.6 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.6 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.6 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.6 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.6
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.6 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.6 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.6 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.6 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.6 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.6 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.6 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.6 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.7 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.7 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.7 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.7 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.7
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.7 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.7 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.7 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.7 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.7 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.7 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.7 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.7 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.8 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.8 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.8 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.8 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.8
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.8 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.8 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.8 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.8 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.8 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.8 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.8 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.8 - 法国

en: Repairability index 0.9 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 0.9 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 0.9 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 0.9 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 0.9
it: Indice di riparabilità 0.9 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 0.9 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 0.9 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 0.9 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 0.9 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 0.9 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 0.9 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 0.9 - 法国

en: Repairability index 1.0 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 1.0 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 1.0 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 1.0 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 1.0
it: Indice di riparabilità 1.0 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 1.0 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 1.0 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 1.0 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 1.0 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 1.0 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 1.0 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 1.0 - 法国

en: Repairability index 1.1 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 1.1 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 1.1 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 1.1 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 1.1
it: Indice di riparabilità 1.1 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 1.1 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 1.1 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 1.1 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 1.1 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 1.1 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 1.1 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 1.1 - 法国

en: Repairability index 1.2 - France
ar: مؤشر قابلية الإصلاح 1.2 - فرنسا
de: Reparierbarkeitsindex 1.2 - Frankreich
es: Índice de reparabilidad 1.2 - Francia
fr: Indice de réparabilité 1.2
it: Indice di riparabilità 1.2 - Francia
ja: 修理可能性指標 1.2 - フランス
ko: 수리 용이성 지수 1.2 - 프랑스
nl: Repareerbaarheid index 1.2 - Frankrijk
pl: Wskaźnik naprawialności 1.2 - Francja
pt: Índice de reparabilidade 1.2 - França
ru: Индекс ремонтопригодности 1.2 - Франция
zh: 可修复性指数 1.2 - 法国